District of Columbia statutes.
42-601

Deed, mortgage, and lease forms.

The following forms or forms to the like effect shall be sufficient, and any covenant, limitation, restriction, or proviso allowed by law may be added, annexed to, or introduced in the said forms. Any other form conforming to the rules herein laid down shall be sufficient:

FEE SIMPLE DEED

This deed, made this _______ day of _____, in the year ______, by me, ______, of ______, witnesseth, that in consideration of (here insert consideration), I, the said ______, do grant unto (here insert grantee’s name), of ______, all that (here describe the property).

Witness my hand and seal. _______________ [Seal.]

DEED BY SPOUSE OR DOMESTIC PARTNER

This deed, made this ______ day of ______, in the year ______, by us, ______ and ______, his or her spouse or domestic partner, of ______, witnesseth, that in consideration of ______, we, the said ______ and his or her spouse or domestic partner, do grant unto ______, of ______, and so forth.

Witness our hands and seals. _______________ [Seal.]

_______________ [Seal.]

DEED OF LIFE ESTATE

This deed, made this _______ day of _____, in the year _____, by me, _______, of _______, witnesseth, that in consideration of ______, I, the said ______, do grant unto ______, of ______, all that (here describe the property), to hold during his life and no longer.

Witness my hand and seal. _______________ [Seal.]

DEED OF TRUST TO SECURE DEBTS, SURETIES, OR FOR OTHER PURPOSES

This deed, made this _______ day of _____, in the year ______, by me, ______, of ______, witnesseth, that whereas (here insert the consideration for the deed), I, the said ______, do grant unto ______, of ______, as trustee, the following property (here describe it) in trust for the following purposes (here insert the trusts and any covenant that may be agreed upon).

Witness my hand and seal. _______________ [Seal.]

FORM OF TRUSTEE’S DEED UNDER A DECREE

This deed, made this _______ day of _____, in the year ______, by me, ______, trustee, of ______, witnesseth: Whereas by a decree of (here insert court) passed on the ______ day of ______, in the cause of ______ versus ______, I, the said ______, was appointed trustee to sell the land decreed to be sold, and have sold the same to ______; and said sale has been ratified by said court, and said ______ has fully paid the purchase money due on said sale; now, therefore, in consideration of the premises, I, the said _____, do grant unto _____, of ______, all the right and title of all the parties to the aforesaid cause, in and to all that (here describe property).

Witness my hand and seal. _______________ [Seal.]

EXECUTOR’S DEED

This deed, made this ______ day of ______, in the year ______, witnesseth, that I, ______, of ______, executor of the last will of ______, late of ______, deceased, under a power in said will contained, in consideration of ______, have sold and do hereby grant to ______, of ______, all that (here describe the property).

Witness my hand and seal. _______________ [Seal.]

FORM OF MORTGAGE, WITH OR WITHOUT POWER OF SALE

This mortgage, made this ______ day of ______, in the year ______, witnesseth, that whereas I, ______, of _____, am indebted unto ______, of _____, in the sum of ______, payable ______, for which I have given to said ______ my (here describe obligation). Now, in consideration thereof, I hereby grant unto the said ______ all that (here describe property), provided that if I shall punctually pay said (notes or other instruments) according to the tenor thereof then this mortgage shall be void. And if I shall make default in such payment the said ______ is hereby authorized and empowered to sell said property at public auction on the following terms (here insert them), and out of the proceeds of sale to retain whatever shall remain unpaid of my said indebtedness and the costs of such sale, and the surplus, if any, to pay to me.

Given under my hand and seal. _______________ [Seal.]

FORM OF LEASE

This lease, made this _________ of _____, in the year ______, between ______, of ______, and ______, of ______, witnesseth, that the said ______ doth lease unto the said ______, his executor, administrator, and assigns, all that (here describe the property) for the term of ______ years, beginning on the ______ day of ______, in the year ______, and ending on the ______ day of __________, in the year _____, the said _____ paying therefor the sum of ______ on the _____ day of ______ in each and every year (or month, as the case may be).

Witness our hands and seals. _______________ [Seal.]

_______________ [Seal.]

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1277, ch. 854, ch. 16, subch. 5
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 533, ch. 1329
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 33(b), 55 DCR 6758

Cross References

Sales and conveyances of public property, see § 10-801 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-501.
1973 Ed., § 45-301.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-231 deleted the Deed by Husband and Wife form and inserted the Deed by Spouse or Domestic Partner form.